Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Reporting Abuse of Children

§ 4911.
Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to:

protect children whose health and welfare may be adversely affected through abuse or neglect;

strengthen the family and make the home safe for children whenever possible by enhancing the parental capacity for good child care;

provide a temporary or permanent nurturing and safe environment for children when necessary; and for these purposes require the reporting of suspected child abuse and neglect, an assessment or investigation of such reports and provision of services, when needed, to such child and family;

establish a range of responses to child abuse and neglect that take into account different degrees of child abuse or neglect and that recognize that child offenders should be treated differently from adults; and

establish a tiered child protection registry that balances the need to protect children and the potential employment consequences of a registry record for persons who are substantiated for child abuse and neglect.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1982; amended

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4912.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Abused or neglected child” means a child whose physical health, psychological growth and development, or welfare is harmed or is at substantial risk of harm by the acts or omissions of his or her parent or other person responsible for the child’s welfare. An “abused or neglected child” also means a child who is sexually abused or at substantial risk of sexual abuse by any person and a child who has died as a result of abuse or neglect.

“Assessment” means a response to a report of child abuse or neglect that focuses on the identification of the strengths and support needs of the child and the family and any services they may require to improve or restore their well-being and to reduce the risk of future harm. The child and family assessment does not result in a formal determination as to whether the reported abuse or neglect has occurred.

“Child” means an individual under the age of majority.

“Child Protection Registry” means a record of all investigations that have resulted in a substantiated report on or after January 1, 1992.

“Emotional maltreatment” means a pattern of malicious behavior that results in impaired psychological growth and development.

“Harm” can occur by:

Physical injury or emotional maltreatment.

Failure to supply the child with adequate food, clothing, shelter, or health care. As used in this subchapter, “adequate health care” includes any medical or nonmedical remedial health care permitted or authorized under State law. Notwithstanding that a child might be found to be without proper parental care under chapters 51 and 53 of this title, a parent or other person responsible for a child’s care legitimately practicing his or her religious beliefs who thereby does not provide specified medical treatment for a child shall not be considered neglectful for that reason alone.

Abandonment of the child.

“Investigation” means a response to a report of child abuse or neglect that begins with the systematic gathering of information to determine whether the abuse or neglect has occurred and, if so, the appropriate response. An investigation shall result in a formal determination as to whether the reported abuse or neglect has occurred.

“Member of the clergy” means a priest, rabbi, clergy member, ordained or licensed minister, leader of any church or religious body, accredited Christian Science practitioner, or person performing official duties on behalf of a church or religious body that are recognized as the duties of a priest, rabbi, clergy, nun, brother, ordained or licensed minister, leader of any church or religious body, or accredited Christian Science practitioner.

“Multidisciplinary team” means a group of professionals, paraprofessionals, and other appropriate individuals impaneled by the Commissioner under this chapter for the purpose of assisting in the identification and review of cases of child abuse and neglect, coordinating treatment services for abused and neglected children and their families, and promoting child abuse prevention.

“Person responsible for a child’s welfare” includes the child’s parent, guardian, foster parent, any other adult residing in the child’s home who serves in a parental role, an employee of a public or private residential home, institution, or agency, or other person responsible for the child’s welfare while in a residential, educational, or child care setting, including any staff person.

“Physical injury” means death or permanent or temporary disfigurement or impairment of any bodily organ or function by other than accidental means.

“Redacted investigation file” means the intake report, the investigation activities summary, and case determination report that are amended in accordance with confidentiality requirements set forth in section 4913 of this title.

“Registry record” means an entry in the Child Protection Registry that consists of the name of an individual substantiated for child abuse or neglect, the date of the finding, the nature of the finding, and at least one other personal identifier, other than a name, listed in order to avoid the possibility of misidentification.

“Risk of harm” means a significant danger that a child will suffer serious harm by other than accidental means, which harm would be likely to cause physical injury, or sexual abuse, including as the result of:

a single, egregious act that has caused the child to be at significant risk of serious physical injury;

the production or preproduction of methamphetamines when a child is actually present;

failing to provide supervision or care appropriate for the child’s age or development and, as a result, the child is at significant risk of serious physical injury;

failing to provide supervision or care appropriate for the child’s age or development due to use of illegal substances or misuse of prescription drugs or alcohol;

failing to supervise appropriately a child in a situation in which drugs, alcohol, or drug paraphernalia are accessible to the child; and

a registered sex offender or person substantiated for sexually abusing a child residing with or spending unsupervised time with a child.

“Sexual abuse” consists of any act or acts by any person involving sexual molestation or exploitation of a child, including:

incest;

prostitution;

rape;

sodomy;

lewd and lascivious conduct involving a child;

aiding, abetting, counseling, hiring, or procuring of a child to perform or participate in any photograph, motion picture, exhibition, show, representation, or other presentation that, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct, sexual excitement, or sadomasochistic abuse involving a child;

viewing, possessing, or transmitting child pornography, with the exclusion of the exchange of images between mutually consenting minors, including the minor whose image is exchanged;

human trafficking;

sexual assault;

voyeurism;

luring a child; or

obscenity.

“Substantiated report” means that the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee has determined after investigation that a report is based upon accurate and reliable information that would lead a reasonable person to believe that the child has been abused or neglected.

“Serious physical injury” means, by other than accidental means:

physical injury that creates any of the following:

a substantial risk of death;

a substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ;

a substantial impairment of health; or

substantial disfigurement; or

strangulation by intentionally impeding normal breathing or circulation of the blood by applying pressure on the throat or neck or by blocking the nose or mouth of another person.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1982; amended

1985, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1989, No. 295

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1991, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1995, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. June 13, 2002;

2003, No. 43

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2003, No. 66

, § 136a;

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. June 7, 2007;

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2007, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 76, eff. May 20, 2014;

2015, No. 60

, § 3.

§ 4913.
Reporting child abuse and neglect; remedial action.

A mandated reporter is any:

health care provider, including any:

physician, surgeon, osteopath, chiropractor, or physician assistant licensed, certified, or registered under the provisions of Title 26;

resident physician;

intern;

hospital administrator in any hospital in this State;

registered nurse;

licensed practical nurse;

medical examiner;

emergency medical personnel as defined in

24 V.S.A. § 2651(6)

;

dentist;

psychologist; and

pharmacist;

individual who is employed by a school district or an approved or recognized independent school, or who is contracted and paid by a school district or an approved or recognized independent school to provide student services, including any:

school superintendent;

headmaster of an approved or recognized independent school as defined in

16 V.S.A. § 11

;

school teacher;

student teacher;

school librarian;

school principal; and

school guidance counselor;

child care worker;

mental health professional;

social worker;

probation officer;

employee, contractor, and grantee of the Agency of Human Services who have contact with clients;

police officer;

camp owner;

camp administrator;

camp counselor; or

member of the clergy.

As used in subsection (a) of this section, “camp” includes any residential or nonresidential recreational program.

Any mandated reporter who reasonably suspects abuse or neglect of a child shall report in accordance with the provisions of section 4914 of this title within 24 hours of the time information regarding the suspected abuse or neglect was first received or observed.

The Commissioner shall inform the person who made the report under subsection (a) of this section:
(d) (1) The Commissioner shall inform the person who made the report under subsection (a) of this section:

whether the report was accepted as a valid allegation of abuse or neglect;

whether an assessment was conducted and, if so, whether a need for services was found; and

whether an investigation was conducted and, if so, whether it resulted in a substantiation.

Upon request, the Commissioner shall provide relevant information contained in the case records concerning a person’s report to a person who:

made the report under subsection (a) of this section; and

is engaged in an ongoing working relationship with the child or family who is the subject of the report.

Any information disclosed under subdivision (2) of this subsection shall not be disseminated by the mandated reporter requesting the information. A person who intentionally violates the confidentiality provisions of this section shall be fined not more than $2,000.00.

In providing information under subdivision (2) of this subsection, the Department may withhold:

information that could compromise the safety of the reporter or the child or family who is the subject of the report; or

specific details that could cause the child to experience significant mental or emotional stress.

Any other concerned person not listed in subsection (a) of this section who has reasonable cause to believe that any child has been abused or neglected may report or cause a report to be made in accordance with the provisions of section 4914 of this title.

Any person other than a person suspected of child abuse, who in good faith makes a report to the Department shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of making a report.
(f) (1) Any person other than a person suspected of child abuse, who in good faith makes a report to the Department shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of making a report.

An employer or supervisor shall not discharge; demote; transfer; reduce pay, benefits, or work privileges; prepare a negative work performance evaluation; or take any other action detrimental to any employee because that employee filed a good faith report in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter. Any person making a report under this subchapter shall have a civil cause of action for appropriate compensatory and punitive damages against any person who causes detrimental changes in the employment status of the reporting party by reason of his or her making a report.

The name of and any identifying information about either the person making the report or any person mentioned in the report shall be confidential unless:

the person making the report specifically allows disclosure;

a Human Services Board proceeding or a judicial proceeding results from the report;

a court, after a hearing, finds probable cause to believe that the report was not made in good faith and orders the Department to make the name of the reporter available; or

a review has been requested pursuant to section 4916a of this title, and the Department has determined that identifying information can be provided without compromising the safety of the reporter or the persons mentioned in the report.

A person who violates subsection (c) of this section shall be fined not more than $500.00.
(h) (1) A person who violates subsection (c) of this section shall be fined not more than $500.00.

A person who violates subsection (c) of this section with the intent to conceal abuse or neglect of a child shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit a prosecution under any other provision of law.

Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section, a person may not refuse to make a report required by this section on the grounds that making the report would violate a privilege or disclose a confidential communication.

A member of the clergy shall not be required to make a report under this section if the report would be based upon information received in a communication that is:

made to a member of the clergy acting in his or her capacity as spiritual advisor;

intended by the parties to be confidential at the time the communication is made;

intended by the communicant to be an act of contrition or a matter of conscience; and

required to be confidential by religious law, doctrine, or tenet.

When a member of the clergy receives information about abuse or neglect of a child in a manner other than as described in subsection (j) of this section, he or she is required to report on the basis of that information even though he or she may have also received a report of abuse or neglect about the same person or incident in the manner described in subsection (j) of this section.

A mandated reporter as described in subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall not be deemed to have violated the requirements of this section solely on the basis of making condoms available to a secondary school student in accordance with

16 V.S.A. § 132

.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1982; amended

1983, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. June 30, 1986;

1989, No. 295

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1993, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 43

, § 3, eff. May 27, 2003;

2005, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. June 7, 2007;

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2009;

2007, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2009, No. 1

, § 45;

2011, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. May 16, 2012;

2011, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2015, No. 60

, § 4;

2019, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. July 1, 2021;

2021, No. 20

, § 335.

§ 4914.
Nature and content of report; to whom made.

A report shall be made orally or in writing to the Commissioner or designee. The Commissioner or designee shall request the reporter to follow the oral report with a written report, unless the reporter is anonymous. Reports shall contain the name and address or other contact information of the reporter as well as the names and addresses of the child and the parents or other persons responsible for the child’s care, if known; the age of the child; the nature and extent of the child’s injuries together with any evidence of previous abuse and neglect of the child or the child’s siblings; and any other information that might be helpful in establishing the cause of the injuries or reasons for the neglect as well as in protecting the child and assisting the family. If a report of child abuse or neglect involves the acts or omissions of the Commissioner or employees of the Department, then the report shall be directed to the Secretary of Human Services who shall cause the report to be investigated by other appropriate Agency staff. If the report is substantiated, services shall be offered to the child and to his or her family or caretaker according to the requirements of section 4915b of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1982; amended

1989, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1989, No. 295

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1995, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 120;

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2007;

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2015, No. 60

, § 4a.

§ 4915.
Assessment and investigation.

Upon receipt of a report of abuse or neglect, the Department shall promptly determine whether it constitutes an allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in section 4912 of this title. The Department shall respond to reports of alleged neglect or abuse that occurred in Vermont and to out-of-state conduct when the child is a resident of or is present in Vermont.

If the report is accepted as a valid allegation of abuse or neglect, the Department shall determine whether to conduct an assessment as provided for in section 4915a of this title or to conduct an investigation as provided for in section 4915b of this title. The Department shall begin either an assessment or an investigation within 72 hours after the receipt of a report made pursuant to section 4914 of this title, provided that it has sufficient information to proceed. The Commissioner may waive the 72-hour requirement only when necessary to locate the child who is the subject of the allegation or to ensure the safety of the child or social worker.

The decision to conduct an assessment shall include consideration of the following factors:

the nature of the conduct and the extent of the child’s injury, if any;

the accused person’s prior history of child abuse or neglect, or lack thereof; and

the accused person’s willingness or lack thereof to accept responsibility for the conduct and cooperate in remediation.

The Department shall conduct an investigation when an accepted report involves allegations indicating substantial child endangerment. For purposes of this section, “substantial child endangerment” includes conduct by an adult involving or resulting in sexual abuse, and conduct by a person responsible for a child’s welfare involving or resulting in abandonment, child fatality, malicious punishment, or abuse or neglect that causes serious physical injury. The Department may conduct an investigation of any report.

The Department shall begin an immediate investigation if, at any time during an assessment, it appears that an investigation is appropriate.

The Department may collaborate with child protection, law enforcement, and other departments and agencies in Vermont and other jurisdictions to evaluate risk to a child and to determine the service needs of the child and family. The Department may enter into reciprocal agreements with other jurisdictions to further the purposes of this subchapter.

The Department shall report to and receive assistance from appropriate law enforcement in the following circumstances:

investigations of child sexual abuse by an alleged perpetrator 10 years of age or older;

investigations of serious physical abuse or neglect requiring emergency medical care, resulting in death, or likely to result in criminal charges;

situations potentially dangerous to the child or Department worker; and

an incident in which a child suffers:

serious bodily injury as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 1021

, by other than accidental means; and

potential violations of:

13 V.S.A. § 2602

(lewd or lascivious conduct with child);

13 V.S.A. chapter 60 (human trafficking);

13 V.S.A. chapter 64 (sexual exploitation of children); and

13 V.S.A. chapter 72 (sexual assault).

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1982; amended

1995, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 300;

1999, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. June 7, 2007;

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2015, No. 60

, § 17.

§ 4915a.
Procedures for assessment.

An assessment, to the extent that is reasonable under the facts and circumstances presented by the particular valid allegation of child abuse or neglect, shall include the following:

An interview with the child’s parent, guardian, foster parent, or any other adult residing in the child’s home who serves in a parental role. The interview shall focus on ensuring the immediate safety of the child and mitigating the future risk of harm to the child in the home environment.

An evaluation of the safety of the subject child and any other children living in the same home environment. The evaluation may include an interview with or observation of the child or children. Such interviews shall occur with the permission of the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian.

In collaboration with the family, identification of family strengths, resources, and service needs, and the development of a plan of services that reduces the risk of harm and improves or restores family well-being.

The assessment shall be completed within 45 days. Upon written justification by the Department, the assessment may be extended, not to exceed a total of 60 days.

Families have the option of declining the services offered as a result of the assessment. If the family declines the services, the case shall be closed unless the Department determines that sufficient cause exists to begin an investigation or to request the State’s Attorney to file a petition pursuant to chapters 51 and 53 of this title. In no instance shall a case be investigated solely because the family declines services.

When an assessment case is closed, there shall be no finding of abuse or neglect and no indication of the intervention shall be placed in the Registry. However, the Department shall document the outcome of the assessment.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 77, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 4915b.
Procedures for investigation.

An investigation, to the extent that it is reasonable under the facts and circumstances presented by the particular allegation of child abuse, shall include all of the following:

A visit to the child’s place of residence or place of custody and to the location of the alleged abuse or neglect.

An interview with or observation of the child reportedly having been abused or neglected. If the investigator elects to interview the child, that interview may take place without the approval of the child’s parents, guardian, or custodian, provided that it takes place in the presence of a disinterested adult who may be, but shall not be limited to being, a teacher, a member of the clergy, a child care provider regulated by the Department, or a nurse.

Determination of the nature, extent, and cause of any abuse or neglect.

Determination of the identity of the person alleged to be responsible for such abuse or neglect.

The identity, by name, of any other children living in the same home environment as the subject child. The investigator shall consider the physical and emotional condition of those children and may interview them, unless the child is the person who is alleged to be responsible for such abuse or neglect, in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(5) (A) The identity, by name, of any other children living in the same home environment as the subject child. The investigator shall consider the physical and emotional condition of those children and may interview them, unless the child is the person who is alleged to be responsible for such abuse or neglect, in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection.

The identity, by name, of any other children who may be at risk if the abuse was alleged to have been committed by someone who is not a member of the subject child’s household. The investigator shall consider the physical and emotional condition of those children and may interview them, unless the child is the person who is alleged to be responsible for such abuse or neglect, in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection.

A determination of the immediate and long-term risk to each child if that child remains in the existing home or other environment.

Consideration of the environment and the relationship of any children therein to the person alleged to be responsible for the suspected abuse or neglect.

All other data deemed pertinent.

For cases investigated and substantiated by the Department, the Commissioner shall, to the extent that it is reasonable, provide assistance to the child and the child’s family. For cases investigated but not substantiated by the Department, the Commissioner may, to the extent that it is reasonable, provide assistance to the child and the child’s family. Nothing contained in this section or section 4915a of this title shall be deemed to create a private right of action.

The Commissioner, designee, or any person required to report under section 4913 of this title or any other person performing an investigation may take or cause to be taken photographs of trauma visible on a child who is the subject of a report. The Commissioner or designee may seek consultation with a physician. If it is indicated appropriate by the physician, the Commissioner or designee may cause the child who is subject of a report to undergo a radiological examination without the consent of the child’s parent or guardian.

Services may be provided to the child’s immediate family whether or not the child remains in the home.

[Repealed.]

The Department shall not substantiate cases in which neglect is caused solely by the lack of financial resources of the parent or guardian.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

2015, No. 60

, § 16.

§ 4916.
Child Protection Registry.

The Commissioner shall maintain a Child Protection Registry that shall contain a record of all investigations that have resulted in a substantiated report on or after January 1, 1992. Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, prior to placement of a substantiated report on the Registry, the Commissioner shall comply with the procedures set forth in section 4916a of this title.
(a) (1) The Commissioner shall maintain a Child Protection Registry that shall contain a record of all investigations that have resulted in a substantiated report on or after January 1, 1992. Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, prior to placement of a substantiated report on the Registry, the Commissioner shall comply with the procedures set forth in section 4916a of this title.

In cases involving sexual abuse or serious physical abuse of a child, the Commissioner in his or her sole judgment may list a substantiated report on the Registry pending any administrative review after:

reviewing the investigation file; and

making written findings in consideration of:

the nature and seriousness of the alleged behavior; and

the person’s continuing access to children.

A person alleged to have abused or neglected a child and whose name has been placed on the Registry in accordance with subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be notified of the Registry entry, provided with the Commissioner’s findings, and advised of the right to seek an administrative review in accordance with section 4916a of this title.

If the name of a person has been placed on the Registry in accordance with subdivision (2) of this subsection, it shall be removed from the Registry if the substantiation is rejected after an administrative review.

A Registry record means an entry in the Child Protection Registry that consists of the name of an individual substantiated for child abuse or neglect, the date of the finding, the nature of the finding, and at least one other personal identifier, other than a name, listed in order to avoid the possibility of misidentification.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules to permit use of the Registry records as authorized by this subchapter while preserving confidentiality of the Registry and other Department records related to abuse and neglect.

For all substantiated reports of child abuse or neglect made on or after the date the final rules are adopted, the Commissioner shall create a Registry record that reflects a designated child protection level related to the risk of future harm to children. This system of child protection levels shall be based upon an evaluation of the risk the person responsible for the abuse or neglect poses to the safety of children. The risk evaluation shall include consideration of the following factors:

the nature of the conduct and the extent of the child’s injury, if any;

the person’s prior history of child abuse or neglect as either a victim or perpetrator;

the person’s response to the investigation and willingness to engage in recommended services; and

the person’s age and developmental maturity.

The Commissioner shall develop rules for the implementation of a system of Child Protection Registry levels for substantiated cases. The rules shall address:

the length of time a person’s name appears on the Registry;

when and how names are expunged from the Registry;

whether the person is a juvenile or an adult;

whether the person was charged with or convicted of a criminal offense arising out of the incident of abuse or neglect; and

whether a Family Division of the Superior Court has made any findings against the person.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1982; amended

1989, No. 295

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1991, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2007;

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2007, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

Particular cases.

In reversing a decision including a mother in the child protection registry on the ground that there had been a risk of harm to the child but that no purpose would be served by placing the mother’s name in the registry, the Human Services Board failed to follow the plain language of the statute. It had no discretion to conflate the two distinct statutory procedures of substantiation and expungement, and it erred in considering whether the mother was likely to commit similar acts of negligence in the future. In re R.H., 2010 VT 95, 189 Vt. 15, 14 A.3d 267, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 95 (2010).

§ 4916a.
Challenging placement on the Registry.

If an investigation conducted in accordance with section 4915b of this title results in a determination that a report of child abuse or neglect should be substantiated, the Department shall notify the person alleged to have abused or neglected a child of the following:

the nature of the substantiation decision, and that the Department intends to enter the record of the substantiation into the Registry;

who has access to Registry information and under what circumstances;

the implications of having one’s name placed on the Registry as it applies to employment, licensure, and registration;

the right to request a review of the substantiation determination by an administrative reviewer, the time in which the request for review shall be made, and the consequences of not seeking a review; and

the right to receive a copy of the Commissioner’s written findings made in accordance with subdivision 4916(a)(2) of this title if applicable.

Under this section, notice by the Department to a person alleged to have abused or neglected a child shall be by first-class mail sent to the person’s last known address.

A person alleged to have abused or neglected a child may seek an administrative review of the Department’s intention to place the person’s name on the Registry by notifying the Department within 14 days of the date the Department mailed notice of the right to review in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) of this section. The Commissioner may grant an extension past the 14-day period for good cause, not to exceed 28 days after the Department has mailed notice of the right to review.
(c) (1) A person alleged to have abused or neglected a child may seek an administrative review of the Department’s intention to place the person’s name on the Registry by notifying the Department within 14 days of the date the Department mailed notice of the right to review in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) of this section. The Commissioner may grant an extension past the 14-day period for good cause, not to exceed 28 days after the Department has mailed notice of the right to review.

The administrative review may be stayed upon request of the person alleged to have committed abuse or neglect if there is a related case pending in the Criminal or Family Division of the Superior Court that arose out of the same incident of abuse or neglect for which the person was substantiated. During the period the review is stayed, the person’s name shall be placed on the Registry. Upon resolution of the Superior Court criminal or family case, the person may exercise his or her right to review under this section by notifying the Department in writing within 30 days after the related court case, including any appeals, has been fully adjudicated. If the person fails to notify the Department within 30 days, the Department’s decision shall become final and no further review under this subsection is required.

The Department shall hold an administrative review conference within 35 days of receipt of the request for review. At least 10 days prior to the administrative review conference, the Department shall provide to the person requesting review a copy of the redacted investigation file, notice of time and place of the conference, and conference procedures, including information that may be submitted and mechanisms for providing information. There shall be no subpoena power to compel witnesses to attend a Registry review conference. The Department shall also provide to the person those redacted investigation files that relate to prior investigations that the Department has relied upon to make its substantiation determination in the case in which a review has been requested.

At the administrative review conference, the person who requested the review shall be provided with the opportunity to present documentary evidence or other information that supports his or her position and provides information to the reviewer in making the most accurate decision regarding the allegation. The Department shall have the burden of proving that it has accurately and reliably concluded that a reasonable person would believe that the child has been abused or neglected by that person. Upon the person’s request, the conference may be held by teleconference.

The Department shall establish an administrative case review unit within the Department and contract for the services of administrative reviewers. An administrative reviewer shall be a neutral and independent arbiter who has no prior involvement in the original investigation of the allegation.

Within seven days of the conference, the administrative reviewer shall:

reject the Department’s substantiation determination;

accept the Department’s substantiation; or

place the substantiation determination on hold and direct the Department to further investigate the case based upon recommendations of the reviewer.

If the administrative reviewer accepts the Department’s substantiation determination, a Registry record shall be made immediately. If the reviewer rejects the Department’s substantiation determination, no Registry record shall be made.

Within seven days of the decision to reject or accept or to place the substantiation on hold in accordance with subsection (g) of this section, the administrative reviewer shall provide notice to the person of his or her decision. If the administrative reviewer accepts the Department’s substantiation, the notice shall advise the person of the right to appeal the administrative reviewer’s decision to the human services board in accordance with section 4916b of this title.

Persons whose names were placed on the Registry on or after January 1, 1992 but prior to September 1, 2007 shall be entitled to an opportunity to seek an administrative review to challenge the substantiation.

If no administrative review is requested, the Department’s decision in the case shall be final, and the person shall have no further right of review under this section. The Commissioner may grant a waiver and permit such a review upon good cause shown. Good cause may include an acquittal or dismissal of a criminal charge arising from the incident of abuse or neglect.

In exceptional circumstances, the Commissioner, in his or her sole and nondelegable discretion, may reconsider any decision made by a reviewer. A Commissioner’s decision that creates a Registry record may be appealed to the Human Services Board in accordance with section 4916b of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2007; amended

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2008;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 221;

2015, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 10, 2016.